Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 1

General Provisions

10-5-101. Agreements to create regional boards — Participation by counties and municipalities — Appropriation of funds.

Two (2) or more counties that have qualified for participation in the state's multi-county regional library program and that have been recognized as a region by the secretary of state and have made the minimum local appropriation of funds that may now or hereafter be required by the secretary of state, are empowered and authorized to execute contracts with each other to create a regional library board to assist the secretary of state, acting through the division of public libraries and archives, in administering and controlling the regional library services within the region. Each county shall be represented by two (2) members of the regional library board. The contract shall be authorized by a resolution of the legislative body of the county desiring to participate and the county mayor shall execute the contract as authorized in the resolution, and the contract shall be attested by the county clerk. After the governing body of a county authorizes participation, municipalities within the county may participate in the regional library service so long as the county participates. A city in a county not participating in a region can, with approval by the secretary of state, join the state regional system as related to state purchasing contracts. The secretary of state shall assess fees, from participating cities, for any additional cost of services under the state contracts. Counties and municipalities may appropriate funds for this purpose. A single county that is large enough to constitute a region and has been so recognized by the secretary of state may also create a regional library board by executing a contract between the county and one (1) or more cities within the county. There shall be at least seven (7) board members apportioned among county and municipalities according to the ratio of population in each participating municipality and in the county outside the municipalities, based on the most recent federal census.

Acts 1955, ch. 88, § 1; 1961, ch. 73, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A., § 10-601; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 14; 1999, ch. 205, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2008, ch. 631, § 17; 2012, ch. 1001, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Library region for penal and reformatory institutions, § 4-6-144.

10-5-102. Members of regional board.

At least one (1) member shall be elected by the legislative body of each county in a multi-county region for a term of three (3) years in accordance with the contract between the counties and as provided in § 10-5-101. In accordance with the contract between the counties and as provided in § 10-5-101, the governing body of any municipality which contributes as much as one-fourth (¼) of the public funds available for the operation of a joint city-county system may elect one (1) of the two (2) members representing that county for a term of three (3) years. If more than one (1) municipality is entitled to elect a member, these municipalities shall alternate in electing one (1) member for a three-year term.

A member of a regional library board shall represent and reside in the county or municipality from which the member was elected. If a member moves from or no longer resides in the county or municipality from which the member was elected, the member must vacate the member's office. If a vacancy occurs on the board, a successor shall be elected for the unexpired term at the next meeting of the governing body of the county or the municipality in which the vacancy occurred. Members shall be elected for no more than two (2) successive terms and may be reappointed after a minimum three-year break in service. A member of the regional library board who is not an active member of a county library board is designated an ex officio member of the county board. A member of the regional library board may be an active member of a county library board.

Acts 1955, ch. 88, § 2; 1961, ch. 73, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 10-602; Acts 1989, ch. 123, § 2; 2017, ch. 126, § 10.

10-5-103. Duties and functions.

A regional library board has the following duties and functions:

Review and concur in the appointment of the chief administrative officer of the regional library program within its region;

Review and submit to the secretary of state recommendations on the annual program for administering the public library service within its region; and

Review the activities performed in carrying out the annual program and submit comments and recommendations to the secretary of state regarding such activities.

Acts 1955, ch. 88, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A., § 10-603; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 15; 1999, ch. 205, § 2; 2017, ch. 126, § 11.

10-5-104. [Reserved.]

The chief administrative officer of each library program, acting under the direction of the secretary of state and within the limitation of funds available, may employ such personnel as may be necessary for administering the public library service within the region. Any individuals so employed shall be subject to personnel policies and regulations applicable to employees of the department of state, such as leave, compensation, classification and travel requests.

Acts 1955, ch. 88, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 10-605; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 17; 1999, ch. 205, § 4.

10-5-106. Donations — Lease of realty — Discontinuance.

The secretary of state, acting through the state librarian and archivist and the division of public libraries and archives, is authorized to accept donations and bequests on behalf of the regional library system.

The secretary of state, acting through the division of public libraries and archives, may lease real estate as may be necessary for library purposes. Any lease shall be between the state of Tennessee and the lessor and shall contain a clause that its continuance shall be subject to necessary allotments from the secretary of state and the availability of other funds.

Acts 1955, ch. 88, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A., § 10-606; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 18; 1999, ch. 205, § 5; 2008, ch. 631, § 18; 2017, ch. 126, § 13.